Mississippi, session 2026, SB2785.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Community Solar Act of 2026." SECTION 2.  As used in this section, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Avoided cost" means the incremental cost to an electric utility which, but for the provision of energy and capacity from a solar technology, such electric utility would incur to generate or procure electricity from another source. (b)  "Bill credit" means the monetary value of kilowatt hours generated by a community solar facility allocated to a subscriber's electricity bill pursuant to the community solar program created by the commission and subject to commission jurisdiction as described in this act. (c) "Commission" means the Public Service Commission. (d)  "Community solar facility" means a system that: (i)  Generates electric energy that is fueled solely by ambient sunlight and is connected to the electric utility's distribution system; (ii)  Is located within the same electric service territory as the customers it serves; (iii)  Has no subscribers that own a subscription for more than forty percent (40%) of such facility's output; (iv)  Is not selling its energy outside of the community solar program; and (v)  1.  Except as provided in item 2 of this subparagraph, is not located on the same parcel as another system that meets the requirements of subparagraphs (i) through (iv) of this paragraph if the total capacity of the systems would exceed five (5) megawatts alternating current, provided, however, that such parcel shall not have been subdivided in order to meet such requirements. 2.  The requirements of item 1 of this subparagraph shall not apply to an aggregate of multiple systems that together do not exceed five (5) megawatts alternating current if such systems are located on the rooftops of buildings, deemed to be in compliance with risk reduction standards, on landfills or over parking lots or roadways. (e)  "Community solar organization" means any for-profit or nonprofit entity that owns, operates or manages subscriptions for one (1) or more community solar facilities. (f)  "Electric supplier" means any electric light and power company subject to regulation by the commission, any electric cooperative furnishing retail service in this state and any municipality which furnishes such service within this state. (g)  "Electric utility" means any retail supplier of electricity whose rates are fixed by the commission, and shall not include any electric cooperative or municipal electric utility. (h) "Subscriber" means a retail customer of an electric utility that owns one (1) or more subscriptions of a community solar facility. SECTION 3. (1)  On or before January 1, 2028, the commission shall establish a program that affords customers the opportunity to participate in community solar projects and which shall reasonably allow for the creation, financing and accessibility of community solar facilities.  Under such program: (a)  Electric utilities shall provide bill credits to subscribers derived from the utility's total aggregate retail rate on a per-customer-class basis, less commission approved distribution cost components. (b)  Excess credits on a subscriber's bill shall roll over from month to month until the end of each calendar year and any such excess credits shall automatically be applied to the next electric bill of a subscriber when the subscriber's subscription is terminated for any reason. (c)  Electric utilities shall provide to community solar organizations a web-based hosting capacity tool to indicate where and how much available capacity exists on the distribution system, updated on at least a semiannual basis. (d)  Electric utilities may impose fees on community solar organizations which fees, if any, shall be: (i)  Just, reasonable and nondiscriminatory; (ii)  Based on the actual cost of providing the service for which the fee is imposed; (iii)  Approved by the commission after public notice, a public hearing and an opportunity for public comment; and (iv)  Not more than one percent (1%) of the bill credit value accrued from such organization's subscriptions during the term for which the fee is imposed, unless found by the commission to be necessary to the public interest. (e)  Electric utilities may, notwithstanding any other provision of law, enter into a long-term purchase agreement with a community solar organization. (2)  The commission may establish rules and regulations that provide for the protection of customers that have subscriptions with or are prospective subscribers of a community solar facility.  Such rules and regulations may relate to the totality of the subscription and the bill crediting process, including requiring standardized customer disclosure forms that identify key information that shall be provided by community solar organizations to potential subscribers. SECTION 4.  A community solar organization: (a)  May sell subscriptions at a rate that shall result in bill savings for the subscriber, provided that such subscriptions shall be sized such that the estimated credits do not exceed ninety percent (90%) of the subscriber's average or expected annual bill for the customer account to which the subscription is attributed; (b)  Shall not require credit checks or up-front, sign-on or exit fees to purchase, transfer or terminate a subscription; (c)  Shall provide the electric utility with information necessary to allocate bill credits to each subscriber; (d)  May bank unsubscribed energy for no more than twenty-four (24) months, at which point such energy shall be purchased by the electric utility at avoided cost; (e)  May transfer or retire on behalf of subscribers the renewable energy credits produced by its community solar facilities; and (f)  Shall be subject to the rules and regulations adopted by the commission pursuant to this act, provided that the sale or transfer of subscriptions shall not be considered the provision of electric service to the public, retail electric service or retail supply of electricity and neither the subscriber nor the community solar organization shall be considered an electric supplier or in violation of exclusive electric service rights arising therein. SECTION 5. (1)  On and after July 1, 2026, an electric utility shall accept interconnection applications for community solar facilities on a nondiscriminatory basis and study the impact of interconnecting such facilities to the grid using the current commission approved interconnection rules, regulations, standards and tariffs and in accordance with best practices. (2)  On or before January 1, 2027, the commission shall establish an Interconnection Study Group between electric utilities and stakeholders with oversight from commission staff.  The Interconnection Study Group shall review and recommend changes or adoption of any policies, processes, rules, regulations, standards and tariffs associated with the interconnection of community solar facilities with the goal of transparency, accuracy and efficiency to support the achievement of the objectives in this act.  The Interconnection Study Group shall report its findings and recommendations to the commission on or before July 1, 2027.  The commission shall review the findings of the Interconnection Study Group and take any action that the commission deems necessary. (3)  On or before October 1, 2027, each electric utility shall submit for commission review and approval a standard interconnection agreement for community solar facilities that meets the following requirements: (a)  An electric utility may recover any direct costs associated with interconnecting and administering metering services as approved by the commission.  Any fees imposed shall be: (i)  Just, reasonable and nondiscriminatory; (ii)  Based on the actual cost of providing the service for which the fee is imposed; and (iii)  Approved by the commission after a public notice, a public hearing and an opportunity for public comment; (b)  A community solar facility shall include, at the interconnection applicant's own expense, all equipment necessary to meet applicable safety, power quality and interconnection requirements established by the National Electrical Code, National Electrical Safety Code, Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers, and Underwriters Laboratories; (c)  An electric utility shall not require an interconnection applicant whose community solar facility meets the standards in paragraph (b) of this section to comply with additional safety or performance standards, perform or pay for additional tests or purchase additional liability insurance; and (d)  No electric utility shall be liable to any person, directly or indirectly, for any loss of property, injury or death that may result from the interconnection of a community solar facility. SECTION 6.  On or before January 1, 2028, each electric utility shall file for commission review a data access program.  Such data access program shall be designed to better enable customers' investments in or subscriptions to conservation and clean energy technologies, including, but not limited to, photovoltaic solar, energy efficiency technologies, battery storage, smart thermostats and electric vehicles.  Following public notice and an opportunity for public comment, the commission shall adopt or amend such proposed program, which the electric utility shall make available to customers within nine (9) months of the commission's final order.  An electric utility's data access program shall conform to the following requirements: (a)  As part of basic utility service, an electric utility shall provide meter usage data in electronic machine-readable form, without additional charge, to the customer or to any third-party recipient to whom the customer has authorized disclosure of the customer's meter usage data.  Such access shall conform to nationally recognized open standards and best practice and shall be provided in fifteen (15) minute intervals or the shortest interval available through existing meters; (b)  An electric utility shall maintain and provide at least twenty-four (24) months of meter usage data or the period of time that a customer has had an account at a given address, whichever is less; and (c)  If the requests are made for more information other than meter usage data or data older than twenty-four (24) months preceding the request, the electric utility may charge customers a reasonable fee to provide such data that is established by the commission based on the electric utility's marginal cost to provide such data. SECTION 7.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.